Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.909

Transfer of powers, duties, and functions pertaining to the energy facility site evaluation council.

(1) All administrative powers, duties, and functions of the department of commerce pertaining to the energy facility site evaluation council are transferred to the Washington utilities and transportation commission. All references to the director or the department of commerce in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the Washington utilities and transportation commission when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the Washington utilities and transportation commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of commerce in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the Washington utilities and transportation commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the Washington utilities and transportation commission.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 2010, be transferred and credited to the Washington utilities and transportation commission.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the Washington utilities and transportation commission. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the Washington utilities and transportation commission to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the Washington utilities and transportation commission. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the Washington utilities and transportation commission.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2010.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned to the Washington utilities and transportation commission under this section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the Washington utilities and transportation commission shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the Washington utilities and transportation commission and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

[ 2010 c 271 s 602.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2010 c 271: See notes following RCW 43.330.005.